test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-puegaemae76_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pügämä: # Verb (76) pügämä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     pügämä+V+Inf/mA: pügämä
     pügämä+V+Inf: pükäq
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc: pügänüq
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [pöet, pöetü]

     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: püä
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [püät, püädeq]
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pügä
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: püämiq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: püätiq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pügäväq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg: [püä-äiq, püä-äi, püä-iq, püä-i]
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: püäq
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: püä
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [pöi, pöie]
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [pöit, pöiq, pöideq, pöieq, pöiet, pöiedeq]
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pügi
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [pöimiq, pöiemiq]
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [pöitiq, pöietiq]
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pöiq, pöiväq, pöieq, pöieväq]
     pügämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: [püä-äs, püä-s]


     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pükäv

     pügämä+V+Jus: pügäguq

     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pöedä
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [pöetät, pöetädeq]
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pöetäs
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pöetämiq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pöetätiq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pöetäseq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Neg: [pöedä-äiq, pöedä-äi, pöedä-iq, pöedä-i]
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegI: pöedäq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: pöedä

     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pöedi
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [pöetit, pöetideq]
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pöeti
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pöetimiq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pöetitiq
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pöediq, pöetiväq]
     pügämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Neg: [pöedä-äs, pöedä-s]

     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pükäv
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: pügävä
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: pügävät
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: pügävähe
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pügäväq
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [pügävide, pügäviide]
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [pügävit, pügäviid]
     pügämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [pügävihe, pügäviihe]

     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pöetäv
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: pöetävä
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: pöetävät
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: pöetävähe
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pöetäväq
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [pöetävide, pöetäviide]
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [pöetävit, pöetäviid]
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [pöetävihe, pöetäviihe]

     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pügänüq
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: pügänü
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: pügänüt
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: pügänühe
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pügänüq
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [pügänüide, pügänüisi]
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [pügänüid, pügänüisi]
     pügämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [pügänüihe, pügänüisihe]

     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [pöet, pöetü]
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: pöedü
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: pöetüt
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: pöetühe
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pöedüq
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [pöetüide, pöetüisi]
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [pöetüid, pöetüisi]
     pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [pöetüihe, pöetüisihe]
